Utah statutes.
58-70a-201.   Board.
(1)  There is created the Physician Assistant Licensing Board, which consists
of seven members:
(a)  four licensed physicians, at least two of whom are individuals who are
supervising or who have supervised a physician assistant, and one of whom may
be a member of a physician licensing board under Section 58-67-201 or
58-68-201;
(b)  one physician assistant;
(c)  one person who is involved in the administration of an approved physician
assistant education program within the state; and
(d)  one person from the general public.
(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section
58-1-201.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board are in accordance with
Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall designate one of
its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:
(a)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or
unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and
(b)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.
(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or
advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the
board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative
proceeding concerning the complaint.  The board member may be disqualified:
(a)  on his own motion, due to actual or perceived bias or lack of
objectivity; or
(b)  upon challenge for cause raised on the record by any party to the
adjudicative proceeding.
